West Virginia, session 2026, SB516.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. SALARIES, WAGES AND OTHER BENEFITS. §18A-4-2. State minimum salaries for teachers. (a) For school year 2024-2025 2026-2027, and continuing thereafter, each teacher shall receive the amount prescribed in the State Minimum Salary Schedule as set forth in this section, specific additional amounts prescribed in this section or article, and any county supplement in effect in a county pursuant to §18A-4-5a of this code during the contract year.STATE MINIMUM SALARY SCHEDULE Years Exp4th Class3rd Class2nd ClassA.B.A.B. 15M.A.M.A. 15M.A. 30M.A.Doctorate 036,59737,28637,55238,99539,75641,52342,28443,04543,80644,841 136,92537,61437,88039,51340,27442,04242,80343,56344,32445,359 237,25437,94238,20840,03240,79342,56043,32144,08244,84345,878 337,58238,27038,53640,55141,31143,07943,84044,60045,36146,396 438,15438,84239,10841,31342,07443,84244,60345,36346,12447,159 538,48239,17039,43641,83242,59344,36045,12145,88246,64347,678 638,81039,49839,76442,35043,11144,87945,64046,40047,16148,196 739,13839,82740,09242,86943,63045,39746,15846,91947,68048,715 839,46640,15540,42143,38744,14845,91646,67747,43748,19849,233 939,79440,48340,74943,90644,66746,43447,19547,95648,71749,752 1040,12340,81141,07744,42645,18646,95447,71548,47649,23650,271 1140,45141,13941,40544,94445,70547,47348,23348,99449,75550,790 1240,77941,46741,73345,46346,22347,99148,75249,51350,27351,308 1341,10741,79542,06145,98146,74248,51049,27050,03150,79251,827 1441,43542,12342,38946,50047,26049,02849,78950,55051,31052,345 1541,76342,45142,71747,01847,77949,54750,30751,06851,82952,864 1642,09142,77943,04547,53748,29750,06550,82651,58752,34753,382 1742,41943,10843,37348,05548,81650,58451,34552,10552,86653,901 1842,74743,43643,70248,57449,33551,10251,86352,62453,38554,420 1943,07543,76444,03049,09249,85351,62152,38253,14253,90354,938 2043,40344,09244,35849,61150,37252,13952,90053,66154,42255,457 2143,73244,42044,68650,12950,89052,65853,41954,17954,94055,975 2244,06044,74845,01450,64851,40953,17653,93754,69855,45956,494 2344,38845,07645,34251,16751,92753,69554,45655,21655,97757,012 2444,71645,40445,67051,68552,44654,21454,97455,73556,49657,531 2545,04445,73245,99852,20452,96454,73255,49356,25457,01458,049 2645,37246,06046,32652,72253,48355,25156,01156,77257,53358,568 2745,70046,38846,65453,24154,00155,76956,53057,29158,05159,086 2846,02846,71746,98253,75954,52056,28857,04857,80958,57059,605 2946,35647,04547,31154,27855,03856,80657,56758,32859,08860,123 3046,68447,37347,63954,79655,55757,32558,08558,84659,60760,642 3147,01347,70147,96755,31556,07657,84358,60459,36560,12561,160 3247,34148,02948,29555,83356,59458,36259,12359,88360,64461,679 3347,66948,35748,62356,35257,11358,88059,64160,40261,16362,198 3447,99748,68548,95156,87057,63159,39960,16060,92061,68162,716 3548,32549,01349,27957,38958,15059,91760,67861,43962,20063,235 50,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,000 50,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,000 50,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,000 50,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,000 50,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,000 50,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,000 50,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,196 50,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,715 50,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,19851,233 50,00050,00050,00050,00050,00050,71751,752 50,00050,00050,00050,00050,47651,23652,271 50,00050,00050,00050,23350,99451,75552,790 50,00050,00050,00050,75251,51352,27353,308 50,00050,00050,51051,27052,03152,79253,827 50,00050,00051,02851,78952,55053,31054,345 50,00050,00051,54752,30753,06853,82954,864 50,00050,29752,06552,82653,58754,34755,382 50,29750,81652,58453,34554,10554,86655,901 50,57451,33553,10253,86354,62455,38556,420 51,09251,85353,62154,38255,14255,90356,938 51,61152,37254,13954,90055,66156,42257,457 52,12952,89054,65855,41956,17956,94057,975 52,64853,40955,17655,93756,69857,45958,494 53,16753,92755,69556,45657,21657,97759,012 53,68554,44656,21456,97457,73558,49659,531 54,20454,96456,73257,49358,25459,01460,049 54,72255,48357,25158,01158,77259,53360,568 55,24156,00157,76958,53059,29160,05161,086 55,75956,52058,28859,04859,80960,57061,605 56,27857,03858,80659,56760,32861,08862,123 56,79657,55759,32560,08560,84661,60762,642 57,31558,07659,84360,60461,36562,12563,160 57,83358,59460,36261,12361,88362,64463,679 58,35259,11360,88061,64162,40263,16364,198 58,87059,63161,39962,16062,92063,68164,716 59,38960,15061,91762,67863,43964,20065,235 (b) Six hundred dollars shall be paid annually to each classroom teacher who has at least 20 years of teaching experience. The payments: (i) Shall be in addition to any amounts prescribed in the applicable State Minimum Salary Schedule; (ii) shall be paid in equal monthly installments; and (iii) shall be considered a part of the state minimum salaries for teachers.(c) Effective July 1, 2019, each classroom teacher providing math instruction in the teacher’s certified area of study for at least 60 percent of the time the teacher is providing instruction to students shall receive an additional $1,200 of annual pay or be considered to have three additional years of experience only for the purposes of the salary schedule set forth in subsection (a) of this section, whichever is greater: Provided, That for any classroom teacher who satisfies these requirements and whose years of experience plus the three additional years due to them exceeds the years of experience provided for on the salary schedule shall be paid the additional amount equivalent to three additional years of experience notwithstanding the maximum experience provided on the salary schedule.(d) Effective July 1, 2019, each classroom teacher certified in special education and employed as a full-time special education teacher, as defined by the State Superintendent, shall receive an additional $1,200 of annual pay or be considered to have three additional years of experience only for the purposes of the salary schedule set forth in subsection (a) of this section, whichever is greater: Provided, That for any classroom teacher who satisfies these requirements and whose years of experience plus the three additional years due to them exceeds the years of experience provided for on the salary schedule shall be paid the additional amount equivalent to three additional years of experience notwithstanding the maximum experience provided on the salary schedule.(e) In accordance with §18A-4-5 of this code, each teacher shall be paid the supplement amount as applicable for his or her classification of certification or classification of training and years of experience as follows, subject to the provisions of that section: (1) For "4th Class" at zero years of experience, $1,781. An additional $38 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(2) For "3rd Class" at zero years of experience, $1,796. An additional $67 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(3) For "2nd Class" at zero years of experience, $1,877. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(4) For "A.B." at zero years of experience, $2,360. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(5) For "A.B. + 15" at zero years of experience, $2,452. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(6) For "M.A." at zero years of experience, $2,644. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(7) For "M.A. + 15" at zero years of experience, $2,740. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(8) For "M.A. + 30" at zero years of experience, $2,836. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience;(9) For "M.A. + 45" at zero years of experience, $2,836. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience; and(10) For "Doctorate" at zero years of experience, $2,927. An additional $69 shall be paid for each year of experience up to and including 35 years of experience.These payments: (i) Shall be in addition to any amounts prescribed in the applicable State Minimum Salary Schedule, any specific additional amounts prescribed in this section and article and any county supplement in effect in a county pursuant to §18A-4-5a of this code; (ii) shall be paid in equal monthly installments; and (iii) shall be considered a part of the state minimum salaries for teachers.